Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-153
Peer review; rules and regulations.

The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to require a firm to enroll in and comply with all requirements of a board-approved program of peer review and comply with all restrictions placed on any permit by the board in response to the results of a peer review.

Laws 2015, LB159, § 3.